Utah statutes.
58-20a-306.   Holders of license under predecessor law.

An individual who has been issued a Utah license as a registered sanitarian prior to July 1, 1995, under any state licensing act in effect prior to the effective date of this chapter, and who holds that license  as of July 1, 1995, may engage in the practice of environmental health science under his existing license and may renew or reinstate that license in accordance with the provisions of Section 58-1-308, under the classification of environmental health scientist, without meeting the qualifications for licensure under Subsection 58-20a-302(1).



Enacted by Chapter 95, 1995 General Session

